Utah statutes.
53-8-103.   Utah Highway Patrol Division -- Creation -- Appointment of
superintendent -- Powers -- Qualifications -- Term -- Compensation.
(1)  There is created the Utah Highway Patrol Division.
(2)  The director of the division shall be the superintendent appointed by the
commissioner with the approval of the governor.
(3)  The superintendent is the executive and administrative head of the
division and shall be experienced in administration and possess additional
qualifications as determined by the commissioner.
(4)  The superintendent acts under the supervision and control of the
commissioner and may be removed from his position at the will of the
commissioner.
(5)  The superintendent shall receive compensation as provided by Title 67,
Chapter 19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.
